test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-haekki_gt-norm.yaml
Cönfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    app: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  noun - häkki: # nouns 'a bull / sonni' - full paradigm
     häkki+N+Sg+Nom: häkki
     häkki+N+Sg+Gen: häkin
     häkki+N+Sg+Acc: [häkki, häkin]
     häkki+N+Sg+Par: häkkii
     häkki+N+Sg+Tra: häkikse
     häkki+N+Sg+Abe: [häkitä, häkittäh]
     häkki+N+Sg+Com: häkinke
     häkki+N+Sg+Ine: häkis
     häkki+N+Sg+Ela: [häkispäi, häkis]
     häkki+N+Sg+Ill: häkkih
     häkki+N+Sg+Ade: häkil
     häkki+N+Sg+Abl: [häkilpäi, häkil]
     häkki+N+Sg+All: häkile
     häkki+N+Sg+Ess: häkinny
     häkki+N+Sg+Ter: häkkissäh
     häkki+N+Sg+Apr: häkillyö
     häkki+N+Pl+Nom: häkit
     häkki+N+Pl+Gen: [häkkien, häkkilöin]
     häkki+N+Pl+Acc: häkit
     häkki+N+Pl+Par: [häkkilöi, häkkii]
     häkki+N+Pl+Tra: [häkikse, häkkilöikse]
     häkki+N+Pl+Abe: [häkitä, häkittäh, häkkilöitä, häkkilöittäh]
     häkki+N+Pl+Com: [häkkienke, häkkilöinke]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ine: [häkis, häkkilöis]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ela: [häkispäi, häkis, häkkilöispäi, häkkilöis]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ill: [häkkilöih, häkkih]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ade: [häkkilöil, häkil]
     häkki+N+Pl+Abl: [häkkilöilpäi, häkkilöil, häkilpäi, häkil]
     häkki+N+Pl+All: [häkile, häkkilöile]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ess: [häkinny, häkkilöinny]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ins: [häkin, häkkilöin]
     häkki+N+Pl+Apr: [häkkiellyö, häkkilöillyö]
     häkki+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: häkkigi
     häkki+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: häkingi
     häkki+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [häkkigi, häkingi]
     häkki+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: häkkiigi
     häkki+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: häkiksegi
     häkki+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [häkitägi, häkittähgi]
     häkki+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: häkinkegi
     häkki+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: häkisgi
     häkki+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [häkispäigi, häkisgi]
     häkki+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: häkkihgi
     häkki+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: häkilgi
     häkki+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [häkilpäigi, häkilgi]
     häkki+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: häkilegi
     häkki+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: häkinnygi
     häkki+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: häkkissähgi
     häkki+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: häkillyögi
     häkki+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: häkitgi
     häkki+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: [häkkiengi, häkkilöingi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: häkitgi
     häkki+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: [häkkiigi, häkkilöigi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: [häkiksegi, häkkilöiksegi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [häkitägi, häkittähgi, häkkilöitägi, häkkilöittähgi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: [häkkienkegi, häkkilöinkegi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: [häkisgi, häkkilöisgi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [häkispäigi, häkisgi, häkkilöispäigi, häkkilöisgi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: [häkkihgi, häkkilöihgi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: [häkilgi, häkkilöilgi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [häkkilöilpäigi, häkkilöilgi, häkilpäigi, häkilgi]
     häkki+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: [häkkilöilegi, häkilegi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: [häkkilöinnygi, häkinnygi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: [häkkilöingi, häkingi]
     häkki+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: [häkkilöillyögi, häkkiellyögi]
